Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXX Contracts
General Provisions

371.010.
Statute of frauds — Contracts to be written.

No action shall be brought to charge any person:

For any representation or assurance concerning the character, conduct, credit, ability, trade, or dealings of another, made with intent that such other may obtain thereby credit, money, or goods;

Upon any promise to pay a debt contracted during infancy, or any ratification of a contract or promise made during infancy;

Upon any promise of a personal representative as such to answer any liability of his decedent out of his own estate;

Upon any promise to answer for the debt, default, or misdoing of another;

Upon any agreement made in consideration of marriage, except mutual promises to marry;

Upon any contract for the sale of real estate, or any lease thereof for longer than one year;

Upon any agreement that is not to be performed within one year from the making thereof;

Upon any promise, agreement, or contract for any commission or compensation for the sale or lease of any real estate or for assisting another in the sale or lease of any real estate; or

Upon any promise, contract, agreement, undertaking, or commitment to loan money, to grant, extend, or renew credit, or make any financial accommodation to establish or assist a business enterprise or an existing business enterprise including, but not limited to the purchase of realty or real property, but this subsection shall not apply to agreements pursuant to which credit is extended by means of a credit card or similar device, or to consumer credit transactions;

unless the promise, contract, agreement, representation, assurance, or ratification, or some memorandum or note thereof, be in writing and signed by the party to be charged therewith, or by his authorized agent. It shall not be necessary to express the consideration in the writing, but it may be proved when necessary or disproved by parol or other evidence.

History.

470: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 174; 1990, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

371.020.
Seal not necessary on any writing — Exceptions.

A seal or scroll is not necessary in order to give effect to any writing. All unsealed writings shall stand upon the same footing with sealed writings, shall have the same effect, and the same actions may be brought thereon. This section does not apply to any law requiring the state or county seal or the seal of a court, corporation or notary to any writing.

History.

471.

371.030.
Consideration of writing may be impeached.

The consideration of any writing, with or without seal, may be impeached or denied by pleading.

History.

472: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 49.

371.040.
Bonds, bills and notes assignable — Effect of assignment.

All bonds, bills or notes for money or property are assignable so as to vest the right of action in the assignee; but, except in the case of negotiable instruments, the assignment shall not impair the right to any defense, discount or set-off that the defendant has and might have used against the original obligee, or any intermediate assignor, before the defendant received notice of the assignment.

History.

474.

371.050.
Assignee to aver consideration — Amount recoverable.

In an action on any assignment of a writing, the consideration for the assignment shall be averred. The plaintiff shall recover no more than the consideration actually paid by him for the note or assignment.

History.

475.

371.060.
Written obligation, when enforceable by representative or survivor of deceased.

A written nonnegotiable obligation to a person or persons who, or some of whom, are dead at the time of its execution, may be proceeded on by the representative of that person or by the survivor, as if it had been executed in the lifetime of the deceased person.

History.

477.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Heir or representative of joint obligor charged as if contract or judgment had been separate, KRS

412.010

.

Patent or deed to dead person inures to heirs, KRS

382.060

.

371.065.
Requirements for valid, enforceable guaranty.

No guaranty of an indebtedness which either is not written on, or does not expressly refer to, the instrument or instruments being guaranteed shall be valid or enforceable unless it is in writing signed by the guarantor and contains provisions specifying the amount of the maximum aggregate liability of the guarantor thereunder, and the date on which the guaranty terminates. Termination of the guaranty on that date shall not affect the liability of the guarantor with respect to:

Obligations created or incurred prior to the date; or

Extensions or renewals of, interest accruing on, or fees, costs or expenses incurred with respect to, the obligations on or after the date.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a guaranty may, in addition to the maximum aggregate liability of the guarantor specified therein, guarantee payment of interest accruing on the guaranteed indebtedness, and fees, charges and costs of collecting the guaranteed indebtedness, including reasonable attorneys’ fees, without specifying the amount of the interest, fees, charges and costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 485, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 38, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

371.070.
Effect of promissory note made payable to obligor.

If a nonnegotiable promissory note is made by the obligor payable to himself or to his order, and is signed on the back by the obligor, and then delivered, the signature and delivery shall constitute a promise to pay the face of the note at maturity to the party to whom the note is delivered, and that party may fill up the blank with words of promise, and recover on it as if he had been named as payee in the note. Such notes shall be assignable as are other promissory notes.

History.

480.

371.080.
Person signing back of note considered assignor.

Any person who signs his name upon the back of a nonnegotiable promissory note shall be considered an assignor as to the party holding it, unless a different purpose is expressed in writing.

History.

481.

371.090.
Agent’s authority to bind another as surety to be in writing.

No person shall be bound as the surety of another by the act of an agent unless the authority of the agent is in writing, signed by the principal, or, if the principal does not write his name, then by his sign or mark, made in the presence of at least one creditable attesting witness.

History.

482.

371.100.
Contract for sale of standing timber to be written.

No contract for the sale of standing trees or standing timber shall be enforceable by action unless the contract or some memorandum thereof is in writing, signed by the person to be charged or by his duly authorized agent.

History.

1409-13.

371.110.
Pledge or transfer of future wages — What instrument shall state.

No assignment, sale, pledge, mortgage or other transfer of wages to be earned or paid in the future, where the whole or a part of the consideration for the assignment, sale, pledge, mortgage or other transfer is a sum of money of less than two hundred dollars ($200) shall be valid unless the instrument evidencing it:

Is in writing subscribed by the assignor, and bears the true date of its signature by the assignor and the true date of delivery of the money;

Contains a true statement of the consideration, the amount of money advanced or paid, the interest and all other fees and charges paid or agreed to be paid by the assignor, the time when the debt, if any, matures and, if the debt is to be paid in installments, the date of payment of each installment; and

Gives the full name and address of each assignee, vendee, pledgee or mortgagee. If the assignee, vendee, pledgee or mortgagee is a partnership, the instrument shall give the name of each member of the partnership, and if it is a corporation or a nonresident partnership or individual, the instrument shall give the name and address of some person in the state upon whom process may be served in any litigation involving the instrument.

History.

4758a-1.

371.120.
Assent of employer required for pledge or transfer of wages.

No such instrument shall be valid against the employer who is to pay the wages until the employer signifies in writing upon the instrument his assent to the assignment, sale, pledge, mortgage or transfer.

History.

4758a-2.

371.130.
Copy to be delivered to wage earner — Endorsement of payments made — Effect of violation or fraud.

No such instrument shall be valid against the wage earner unless a true and complete copy is delivered to him at or before the time of the payment of the consideration to him.

No such instrument shall be valid against any such wage earner in any case where the copy was, with or without the consent of the wage earner, taken from his possession, altered or destroyed by the assignee, vendee, pledgee or mortgagee, or his agent.

The assignee, vendee, pledgee or mortgagee shall, upon demand and the payment of ten cents ($0.10), furnish the wage earner an exact copy of the instrument. Any false statement made in the copy shall make the original instrument invalid against the wage earner.

The time and amount of all payments made by the wage earner under the terms of the instrument shall be endorsed on the copy and on the original, and shall be a part thereof. A failure to endorse any such payment shall make the instrument invalid.

History.

4758a-3.

371.140.
Instrument to be definite and to bear execution date.

No such instrument shall be valid or enforceable unless it is for a fixed and definite part of the wages earned or to be earned during a period not exceeding ninety (90) days immediately following the date of the instrument. Any such instrument bearing any other date than that of its execution shall be void.

History.

4758a-4.

371.150.
Exemptions.

KRS

371.110

to

371.150

do not apply to any national or state bank, or to any credit union or trust company.

History.

4758a-5.

371.160.
Deposit in escrow of amount held back by owner in contract involving improvement of real estate.

If, in any contract in the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more involving the improvement of real estate, a certain amount or percentage of the contract is held back by the owner, that retained amount shall be deposited in a separate escrow account with a bank or trust company authorized to do business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

As of the time of the deposit of the retained funds, they shall become the sole and separate property of the contractor to whom they are owed.

The escrow agent shall promptly invest all escrowed principal in obligations selected by the escrow agent in its discretion.

Upon satisfactory completion of the contract, to be evidenced by a written release by the owner, all funds accumulated in the escrow account, together with any interest thereon, shall be paid immediately to the contractor to whom it is owed.

The escrow agent shall be compensated for its services in an amount agreed to by the owner, contractor, and escrow agent. The compensation shall be a commercially reasonable fee commensurate with fees being charged for handling of escrow accounts of similar size and duration. The compensation shall be paid from the escrow account.

In the event the owner fails or refuses to execute the release provided for in subsection (4) of this section, then the contractor shall have a cause of action against the owner in a court of proper jurisdiction.

This section shall not apply to contracts with the Commonwealth, any county, charter county, urban-county government, or municipality, or any other political subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the Commonwealth, or school boards.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 506, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 340, § 2, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section is applicable to contracts excluding those with the Commonwealth and school boards which were entered into on and subsequent to the effective date of the statute which in this case was July 13, 1990.

OAG 91-40

.

371.170.
Contracts for the payment of manufacturers’ excise taxes.

If a contract requires one (1) party to reimburse another party for taxes levied under Part III of Subchapter A of Chapter 32 of the Internal Revenue Code, the party making the reimbursement, at its option, shall not be required to reimburse the other party more than one (1) business day before the other party is required to remit the taxes to the Internal Revenue Service.

If a party chooses to exercise its option under subsection (1) of this section, and provision is not already provided in the contract, the party shall notify the other party in writing of its intention. The option may not be exercised until at least thirty (30) days after the written notification or the beginning of the next federal tax quarter, whichever is later.

The party to be reimbursed under subsection (1) of this section may require security from the reimbursing party for the payment of the taxes in proportion to the amount the taxes represent compared to the security required on the contract as a whole. The party to be reimbursed shall not change other payment terms of the contract due to the timing of the tax reimbursement, but may require the taxes to be reimbursed by electronic transfer of funds.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 143, § 1, effective July 13, 2004.

371.180.
Construction services contracts.

As used in this section:

“Construction services contract” means:

A contract or agreement relating to the construction, alteration, repair, addition to, subtraction from, improvement to, or maintenance of any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate, including moving and demolition connected therewith; or

A contract or agreement relating to the planning, design, administration, study, evaluation, consulting, or other professional and technical support services provided in connection with any of the work or activities described in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph.

“Contractor” means the person offering a contract for services provided.

“Contractee” means the person providing services under a contract.

Any provision contained in any construction services contract purporting to indemnify or hold harmless a contractor from that contractor’s own negligence or from the negligence of his or her agents, or employees is void and wholly unenforceable.

This section does not apply to construction bonds or affect the validity of insurance contracts.

This section does not affect contracts or agreements entered into before June 20, 2005.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 156, § 1, effective June 20, 2005.

371.190.
Obligation of debtor not extinguished or affected by internal actions of creditor.

The obligation of a debtor or obligor to pay or satisfy a debt, liability, or other obligation, including an obligation to pay interest, is not extinguished or otherwise adversely affected, in whole or in part, by any internal action or reporting of internal actions taken by the creditor or other obligee for purposes of the creditor or obligee’s own financial, tax, or accounting records or affairs, including but not limited to treating the debt, liability, or other obligation as not collectible.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the debtor or obligor, in any event, from proving that it has fully or partially paid or otherwise satisfied the debt, liability, or other obligation in accordance with the terms of the debt, liability, or other obligation.

HISTORY:

2018 ch. 140, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.